District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.20

Authorization of Director to promulgate regulations.

The Director shall have the authority to implement the basic business license system outlined in this subchapter by appropriate regulation.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(l), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(s), 50 DCR 6913
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.20.
D.C. Law 15-38 substituted “basic” for “master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(s) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
Short title of title II of D.C. Law 12-261: Section 2001 of D.C. Law 12-261 provided that title II of the act may be cited as the Business Regulatory Reform Act of 1998.
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 5-84, the District of Columbia Funeral Services Regulatory Act of 1984, see Mayor’s Order 2007-216, October 5, 2007 ( 55 DCR 149).